Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-411
Willful failure of prisoner to comply with court order; deemed an escape from custody.

The willful failure of a prisoner to comply with the order of the court granting him the privilege of leaving the jail as provided by sections 47-401 to 47-411 or to return within the time set forth in such order shall be deemed an escape from custody punishable as provided by applicable municipal ordinances or state statutes.

Laws 1969, c. 208, § 11, p. 815.